ja: 電子機器 > 通信機器: 留守番電話; 発信者番号通知; 無線通信関連用品; 無線通信; 光ファイバー部品; インターホン関連用品; インターホン; ポケットベル用アクセサリー; ポケットベル; 衛星通信機・メッセンジャー; 電話; ビデオ会議システム; ビデオ会議用アクセサリー; 無線通信モジュール
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Comunicações: Atendedores de chamadas; ID de chamador; Acessórios de comunicação rádio; Rádios de comunicação; Componentes de fibra ótica; Acessórios de intercomunicações; Intercomunicações; Acessórios para pagers; Pagers; Comunicadores e mensageiros por satélite; Telefonia; Videoconferência; Acessórios para videoconferência; Módulos de comunicação sem fios
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > การสื่อสาร: เครื่องตอบรับโทรศัพท์อัตโนมัติ; ID ผู้โทร; อุปกรณ์วิทยุสื่อสาร; วิทยุสื่อสาร; ชิ้นส่วนไฟเบอร์ออปติก; อุปกรณ์อินเทอร์คอม; อินเตอร์คอม; อุปกรณ์เสริมเพจเจอร์; เพจเจอร์; เครื่องสื่อสารและส่งข้อความผ่านดาวเทียม; การโทรศัพท์; การประชุมทางวิดีโอ; อุปกรณ์เสริมประชุมทางวิดีโอ; โมดูลสื่อสารไร้สาย
fr: Appareil électronique > Communications: Répondeurs; Identification de l’appelant; Accessoires de communication par radio; Radios de communication; Composants en fibre optique; Accessoires pour interphone; Interphones; Accessoires pour pagers; Pagers; Communicateurs et messagers satellitaires; Téléphonie; Visioconférence; Accessoires pour visioconférence; Modules pour communication sans fil
it: Elettronica > Comunicazioni: Segreterie telefoniche; Identificazione chiamante; Accessori comunicazioni radio; Radio di comunicazione; Componenti in fibra ottica; Accessori per intercomunicazione; Interfoni; Accessori per cercapersone; Cercapersone; Dispositivi di comunicazione e messaggistica satellitare; Telefonia; Videoconferenze; Accessori per videoconferenza; Moduli di comunicazione wireless
sl-SI: Elektronika > Komunikacija: Telefonski odzivniki; ID-ji klicatelja; Dodatki za radijsko komunikacijo; Radijske postaje; Optične komponente; Dodatki za domofone; Domofoni; Dodatki za pozivnike; Pozivniki; Satelitski komunikatorji in sporočilne naprave; Telefonija; Videokonference; Dodatki za videokonference; Brezžični komunikacijski moduli
da: Elektronik > Kommunikation: Telefonsvarere; Opkalds-id'er; Kommunikationsradio – tilbehør; Kommunikationsradioer; Fiberoptiske komponenter; Samtaleanlæg – tilbehør; Samtaleanlæg; Personsøger – tilbehør; Personsøgere; Satellitkommunikatorer og beskedtjenester; Telefoni; Videomøder; Videomøder – tilbehør; Trådløse kommunikationsmoduler
ko: 전자기기 > 통신: 자동응답기; 발신자 번호 표시기; 무선 통신기 부대용품; 무선 통신기; 광섬유 부품; 인터폰 부대용품; 인터폰; 호출기 액세서리; 무선 호출기; 위성 통신기 및 메신저; 전화; 화상 회의 시스템; 화상 회의 액세서리; 무선 통신 모듈
sk-SK: Elektronika > Komunikačné zariadenia: Záznamníky; ID volajúceho; Príslušenstvo pre komunikačné rádiové zariadenia; Komunikačné rádiá; Optické komponenty; Príslušenstvo interkomu; Interkomy; Príslušenstvo pagerov; Pagery; Satelitné komunikátory a vysielače; Telefonovanie; Videokonferencie; Príslušenstvo videokonferencií; Bezdrôtové komunikačné moduly
tr: Elektronik > Haberleşme: Telesekreterler; Arayan Numarayı Gösteren Cihazlar; İletişim Telsizi Aksesuarları; İletişim Telsizleri; Fiber Optik Bileşenler; İnterkom Aksesuarları; İnterkomlar; Çağrı Cihazı Aksesuarları; Çağrı Cihazları; Uydu İletişim Cihazları ve Haberleşme Cihazları; Telefon İletişimi; Video Konferans Cihazları; Video Konferans Aksesuarları; Kablosuz İletişim Modülleri
es: Electrónica > Comunicación: Contestadores automáticos; Identificadores de llamada; Accesorios para sistemas de comunicación por radio; Comunicación por radio; Componentes de fibra óptica; Accesorios de intercomunicadores; Intercomunicadores; Accesorios de buscapersonas; Buscapersonas; Comunicadores y mensajeros satelitales; Telefonía; Videoconferencias; Accesorios de videoconferencia; Módulos de comunicación inalámbrica
ro-RO: Electronice > Comunicații: Roboți telefonici; Funcții de identificare a apelantului; Accesorii radio comunicații; Radiouri pentru comunicații; Componente pentru fibră optică; Accesorii interfon; Interfoane; Accesorii pentru pager; Pagere; Dispozitive de comunicare și mesagerie prin satelit; Telefonie; Videoconferință; Accesorii pentru videoconferință; Module de comunicație wireless
ru: Электроника > Связь: Автоответчики; Автоматические определители номера; Аксессуары для радиостанций; Радиостанции; Компоненты оптоволоконной связи; Аксессуары для домофонов; Домофоны; Аксессуары для пейджеров; Пейджеры; Спутниковые коммуникаторы и мессенджеры; Телефония; Видеоконференции; Аксессуары для видеоконференций; Модули беспроводной связи
bg-BG: Електроника > Комуникации: Телефонни секретари; Идентификатори на обаждащия се; Комуникационни радио аксесоари; Комуникационни радиостанции; Компоненти за оптичен кабел; Аксесоари за домофони; Домофони; Аксесоари за пейджър; Пейджъри; Сателитни комуникатори и месинджъри; Телефония; Видеоконференции; Аксесоари за видео конференция; Модули за безжична комуникация
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Comunicações: Secretárias eletrônicas; Identificadores de chamada; Acessórios para rádio de comunicação; Rádios para comunicação; Componentes de fibra óptica; Acessórios para comunicação interna; Interfones; Acessórios para pager; Pagers; Mensageiros e comunicadores via satélite; Telefonia; Videoconferência; Acessórios para videoconferência; Módulos de comunicação sem fio
lt-LT: Elektronika > Ryšiai: Atsakikliai; Skambintojo ID; Radijo stotelių priedai; Radijo stotelės; Šviesolaidiniai komponentai; Domofonų priedai; Domofonai; Pranešimų gaviklių priedai; Pranešimų gavikliai; Palydoviniai komunikatoriai ir pranešimų gavikliai; Telefonija; Vaizdo konferencijos; Vaizdo konferencijų priedai; Belaidžio ryšio moduliai
cs: Elektronika > Komunikace: Záznamníky; Identifikátory volajícího; Radiokomunikační příslušenství; Vysílačky; Komponenty pro optická vlákna; Příslušenství k domovním telefonům; Domovní telefony; Příslušenství pro pagery; Pagery; Satelitní komunikátory a přenosová zařízení; Telefony; Videokonference; Příslušenství pro videokonference; Moduly bezdrátové komunikace
de: Elektronik > Kommunikationsgeräte: Anrufbeantworter; Anruferkennung; Funkzubehör; Funkgeräte; Glasfaserkomponenten; Sprechanlagen-Zubehör; Sprechanlagen; Pager-Zubehör; Pager; Satellitenkommunikatoren und -Messenger; Telefone; Videokonferenzsysteme; Videokonferenz-Zubehör; Drahtlose Kommunikationsmodule
fi: Elektroniikka > Viestintä: Vastaajat; Soittajan tunnistuslaitteet; Radiotarvikkeet; Viestintäradiot; Valokuitukomponentit; Sisäpuhelimen lisätarvikkeet; Sisäpuhelimet; Hakulaitetarvike; Hakulaite; Satelliittiviestintälaitteet; Puhelinliikenne; Videokokoukset; Videoneuvottelutarvike; Langattoman viestinnän moduulit
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Επικοινωνίες: Αυτόματοι τηλεφωνητές; Αναγνώριση κλήσεων; Αξεσουάρ ραδιοεπικοινωνίας; Ραδιοεπικοινωνίες; Εξαρτήματα οπτικών ινών; Αξεσουάρ ενδοεπικοινωνίας; Συστήματα ενδοεπικοινωνίας; Αξεσουάρ βομβητή; Συσκευές τηλεειδοποίησης; Δορυφορικοί πομποδέκτες & συσκευές ανταλλαγής μηνυμάτων; Τηλεφωνία; Τηλεδιάσκεψη; Αξεσουάρ τηλεδιάσκεψης; Μονάδες ασύρματης επικοινωνίας
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị liên lạc: Máy trả lời tự động; Thiết bị nhận diện người gọi; Phụ kiện bộ đàm liên lạc; Thiết bị thông tin vô tuyến; Thành phần sợi quang; Phụ kiện hệ thống intercom; Hệ thống liên lạc nội bộ; Phụ kiện máy nhắn tin; Máy nhắn tin; Thiết bị liên lạc và nhắn tin vệ tinh; Điện thoại; Hội nghị truyền hình; Phụ kiện hội nghị video; Mô-đun liên lạc không dây
sv: Elektronik > Kommunikation: Telefonsvarare; Nummerpresentatörer; Tillbehör till kommunikationsradio; Kommunikationsradio; Fiberoptiska komponenter; Tillbehör till porttelefon; Porttelefoner; Personsökartillbehör; Personsökare; Satellitkommunikatörer och budbärare; Telefoni; Videokonferens; Videokonferenstillbehör; Trådlösa kommunikationsmoduler
nb: Elektronikk > Kommunikasjon: Telefonsvarere; Innringer-ID-apparater; Tilbehør til kommunikasjonsradioer; Kommunikasjonsradioer; Fiberoptiske komponenter; Intercom-tilbehør; Intercomer; Personsøker-tilbehør; Personsøkere; Satellittkommunikatorer og Messenger; Telefoni; Videokonferanseutstyr; Videokonferansetilbehør; Trådløse kommunikasjonsmoduler
hr-HR: Elektronika > Komunikacija: Telefonske sekretarice; Identifikacija pozivatelja; Pribor za radijsku komunikaciju; Komunikacijski radijski uređaji; Komponente optičkih vlakana; Pribor za portafon; Portafoni; Dodaci za dojavljivače; Pageri; Satelitski komunikatori i razmjena poruka; Telefonija; Videokonferencije; Dodaci za videokonferencije; Moduli za bežičnu komunikaciju
hu: Elektronika > Kommunikáció: Üzenetrögzítők; Hívóazonosítók; Kommunikációs rádiókiegészítők; Kommunikációs rádiók; Optikai szálas alkatrészek; Intercom-kiegészítők; Intercomok; Személyhívó kiegészítők; Személyhívók; Műholdas kommunikátorok és üzenetküldők; Telefonálás; Videokonferencia; Videokonferencia-kiegészítők; Vezeték nélküli kommunikációs modulok
en: Electronics > Communications: Answering Machines; Caller IDs; Communication Radio Accessories; Communication Radios; Fiber Optic Components; Intercom Accessories; Intercoms; Pager Accessories; Pagers; Satellite Communicators & Messengers; Telephony; Video Conferencing; Video Conferencing Accessories; Wireless Communication Modules
nl: Elektronica > Communicatie: Antwoordapparaten; Beller-identificatiesystemen; Accessoires voor communicatieradio's; Communicatieradio's; Glasvezelcomponenten; Intercomaccessoires; Intercomsystemen; Pager accessoires; Pagers; Satellietcommunicatoren en boodschappers; Telefonie; Videoconferenties; Videoconferentie accessoires; Draadloze communicatiemodules
pl: Elektronika > Telekomunikacja: Automatyczne sekretarki; Identyfikatory dzwoniącego; Akcesoria do komunikacji radiowej; Urządzenia radiowe; Komponenty światłowodowe; Akcesoria do interkomów; Interkomy; Akcesoria pagera; Pagery; Komunikatory i przekaźniki satelitarne; Telefonia; Konferencje wideo; Akcesoria do konferencji wideo; Moduły bezprzewodowej komunikacji
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 通訊設備: 答錄機; 來電顯示裝置; 通訊無線電配件; 對講機; 光纖元件; 對講機配件; 內部對講機; 呼叫器配件; 呼叫器; 衛星通訊器與訊息傳輸器; 電話設備; 視訊會議設備; 視訊會議配件; 無線通訊模組
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 通讯: 答录机; 来电识别; 无线电通讯配件; 通讯无线电设备; 光纤器件; 对讲机配件; 对讲（可视）系统; 寻呼机配件; 寻呼机; 卫星通信器和消息传输设备; 电话; 视频会议; 视频会议配件; 无线通信模块